Utah statutes.
73-29-201.   General access provisions.
(1)  The public may use a public water for recreational activity if:
(a)  the public water:
(i)  is a navigable water; or
(ii)  is on public property; and
(b)  the recreational activity is not otherwise prohibited by law.
(2)  A person may access and use a public water on private property for any
lawful purpose with the private property owner's permission.
(3)  A person may not access or use a public water on private property for
recreational purposes if the private property is property to which access is
restricted, unless public recreational access is established under Section
73-29-203.
